Texas, session 892, HB189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 418.042(b), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  In preparing and revising the state emergency management plan, the division shall: (1)  seek the advice and assistance of local government, business, labor, industry, agriculture, civic organizations, volunteer organizations, and community leaders; (2)  give all interested persons, including persons with disabilities, a reasonable opportunity to submit data, views, or arguments about the plan or revision, orally or in writing, unless the plan or revision contains sensitive information relating to critical infrastructures or facilities; and (3)  consider fully all written and oral submissions about the proposed plan or revision received under Subdivision (2). SECTION 2.  Section 418.106, Government Code, is amended by adding Subsection (a-1) to read as follows: (a-1)  Before adopting or revising an emergency management plan, a local or interjurisdictional agency, as applicable, shall give all interested persons, including persons with disabilities, a reasonable opportunity to submit data, views, or arguments about the plan or revision, orally or in writing, and shall consider fully all written and oral submissions about the proposed plan or revision. A local or interjurisdictional agency is not required to comply with the requirements of this subsection if the plan or revision contains sensitive information described by Subsection (e). SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.